Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2203XS (2) 91 da/ns S.F. 107 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 169B.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âCatâ means a domesticated animal classified as belonging 4 to the family felidae, subfamily felinae, and genus felis. 5 2. a. âDeclawing procedureâ means any of the following: 6 (1) A procedure referred to as onychectomy, dactylectomy, 7 phalangectomy, or tendonectomy. 8 (2) A procedure that removes a portion of the paw or digit 9 of an animal in order to remove the animalâs claw. 10 (3) A procedure that cuts or modifies the tendon of the 11 limb, paw, or digit of an animal in order to prohibit the 12 normal movement of a claw. 13 (4) A procedure that prevents the normal functioning of one 14 or more claws of an animal. 15 b. âDeclawing procedureâ does not mean nail filing, nail 16 trimming, or the placement of temporary nail caps on an 17 animalâs claw. 18 3. a. âTherapeutic purposeâ means any action to address an 19 existing or recurring infection, disease, injury, or abnormal 20 condition in a claw, nail bed, or toe bone that jeopardizes 21 the health of an animal and treating the infection, disease, 22 injury, or abnormal condition constitutes a medical necessity. 23 b. âTherapeutic purposeâ does not mean an action performed 24 for cosmetic or aesthetic reasons or reasons of convenience in 25 the keeping or handling of an animal. 26 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 169B.2 Prohibition ââ exception for 27 therapeutic purpose. 28 1. A person shall not perform a declawing procedure on a 29 cat. 30 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to a licensed veterinarian 31 who performs a declawing procedure on a cat for a therapeutic 32 purpose. 33 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 169B.3 Civil penalty ââ scheduled 34 violation. 35 -1- LSB 2203XS (2) 91 da/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 107 A violation of section 169B.2 is punishable as a scheduled 1 violation under section 805.8C. 2 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 169B.4 Enforcement. 3 This chapter may be enforced by any of the following: 4 1. A regularly employed member of a police force of a city 5 or county, including a sheriff, who is responsible for the 6 prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the 7 criminal laws of this state. 8 2. A peace officer member of the department of public safety 9 as defined in chapter 80. 10 Sec. 5. Section 805.8C, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. Cat declawing. 13 a. For a violation of section 169B.2, the scheduled fine 14 is a civil penalty. The amount of the scheduled fine is as 15 follows: 16 (1) For an initial violation, the person shall be subject to 17 a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars. 18 (2) For a second violation committed within two years, the 19 person shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of one 20 thousand five hundred dollars. 21 (3) For a third or subsequent violation committed within 22 five years, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty in 23 the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars. 24 b. The amount of the civil penalty shall be deposited as 25 follows: 26 (1) In the general fund of the county or city if the 27 violation is enforced by a law enforcement officer of the 28 county or city. 29 (2) In the general fund of the state if the violation is 30 enforced by a peace officer member of the department of public 31 safety as defined in chapter 80. 32